New York, session 2025-2026, S4602.
do enact as follows:
Section 1. The election law is amended by adding a new section 3-109
to read as follows:
§ 3-109. Disruption; additional time for voting; publicity of remedy.
1. (a) Except as provided in subdivision two of this section, in the
event that early voting or election day voting at one or more polling
places, or for one or more election districts, is delayed or disrupted
prior to the close of polls on any day of election for a duration
exceeding fifteen consecutive minutes, the board of elections shall
toll, adjust, and extend the scheduled timeframe for voting on that day
of election to account for and compensate the lost time for voting at
all such impacted polling places or election districts. For the
purposes of this section, "delay or disruption" and variations thereof
shall mean when no voting is occurring due to an obstruction or inter-
ruption of voting at a polling place or election district for a period
of time exceeding fifteen consecutive minutes during a scheduled time-
frame for voting.
(b) Pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subdivision, in the event that
early voting or election day voting at one or more polling places, or
for one or more election districts, is delayed or disrupted, such sched-
uled timeframe for voting shall be tolled, beginning from the actual
time of commencement of the delay or disruption to voting, or, if such
actual time cannot be reasonably determined by the board of elections,
EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets
[ ] is old law to be omitted.
LBD07308-03-5

S. 4602--A 2
beginning at the latest from the time a report of such delay or
disruption is first electronically transmitted or telephonically commu-
nicated to the board of elections. Such tolling shall continue until
such time as the delay or disruption to voting has ended and the
impacted election districts and polling places have reopened for voting,
or the time for the scheduled close of polls on that day of election,
whichever occurs first. The scheduled timeframe for voting shall then be
adjusted, proportionately, for each such polling place or election
district, and extended on that day of election, or, if extending the
timeframe for voting at such election districts or polling places on
that day of election, or in that location, would be administratively
impracticable, such additional time for voting shall be scheduled on the
next day for voting or a successive day for voting scheduled for the
same election, but not later than election day, in the same polling
place or, if such polling place is unavailable, at alternative locations
that may be designated as polling places pursuant to the provisions of
section 4-104 of this chapter and is, to the extent practicable, in
close proximity to the delayed or disrupted polling places or election
districts, to account for and compensate the lost time at all such
impacted polling places or election districts.
(c) In any election district or polling place in which a voting
machine or voting system was used prior to a delay or disruption, such
machine or system shall be used for the additional time for voting
unless found to be inoperable, in which case the provisions of section
7-120 of this chapter shall apply. Except as directed by the board of
elections, the original seal on such machines shall not be removed nor
shall the machines be unlocked until the reopening of the polls and the
board of elections shall provide additional seals as necessary to be
used as soon as the polls are closed on such day. The state board of
elections shall promulgate rules and/or regulations to ensure the fair,
transparent, and uniform administration of this section.
2. (a) By majority vote of the commissioners, the board of elections
may determine that the remedy of additional time for voting to account
and compensate for the lost time for voting as prescribed by subdivision
one of this section would constitute inappropriate or unnecessary relief
in light of the particular circumstances of delay or disruption
presented at a specific polling place or election district. Such vote
shall be taken during a public meeting held for such purpose, shall
specify the cause or nature of the delay or disruption, and shall memo-
rialize in writing the results of any such vote and the particular
considerations relied upon by the board of elections in reaching a
determination that a proportionate extension of time to account and
compensate for the lost time at such impacted polling places or election
districts would constitute inappropriate or unnecessary relief.
(b) In the event that the board of elections reaches such determi-
nation, such board shall electronically or telephonically inform the
bipartisan co-executive directors of the state board of elections and
the civil rights bureau of the office of the attorney general regard-
ing the circumstances that appear to have caused delay or disruption and
an accounting of the polling places or election districts impacted,
the respective durations of such delays or disruptions, the results of
such vote, the particular circumstances relied upon by the board of
elections in reaching a determination that a proportionate extension
of time to account and compensate for the lost time at such impacted
polling places or election districts would constitute inappropriate or
unnecessary relief, any alternative remedial action taken by the

S. 4602--A 3
board of elections or other individuals or entities, and a description
of all related publicity efforts already undertaken or to be undertaken.
3. (a) In the event that the scheduled timeframe for early voting or
election day voting at one or more polling places, or for one or more
election districts, is extended pursuant to subdivision one of this
section, the board of elections shall, with the assistance of the state
board of elections, and under the coordination of the state board of
elections if necessary, make use of all reasonable means and channels of
communications to publicize, forthwith, the remedial action taken with
respect to the polling places and/or election districts impacted, indi-
cating in plain language the duration and timeframe of such remedial
action, as follows:
(i) electronically or telephonically inform the bipartisan co-execu-
tive directors of the state board of elections and the civil rights
bureau of the office of the attorney general of the circumstances that
appear to have caused the delay or disruption at issue, an accounting of
the polling places or election districts impacted and the respective
durations of such delays or disruptions, the remedial action taken, and
a description of all related publicity efforts already undertaken or to
be undertaken;
(ii) electronically or telephonically inform any candidate or commit-
tee with candidates or questions appearing on a ballot to be voted upon
in any such polling place or election district impacted, or the desig-
nated agent of such candidate or committee of the remedial action taken,
and including a description of all related publicity efforts already
undertaken or to be undertaken;
(iii) electronically or telephonically inform local print and broad-
cast news media organizations and local non-partisan civic organizations
and community-based groups situated within the municipalities impacted
or serving segments of the voting public or communities impacted,
including media and civic organizations primarily serving prevalent
language-minority communities, and including a description of all
related publicity efforts already undertaken or to be undertaken; and
(iv) utilize free or paid traditional, website, and social media chan-
nels and networks, including official advisory or public notification
tools or websites made available by the impacted county or munici-
palities, and issue electronic mail or phone or text messages directly
to impacted voters who have not already voted and who have provided such
personal contact information to the board of elections, to inform the
voting public residing in the communities served by the impacted polling
places or election districts of the remedial action taken and the
remaining opportunities to vote.
(b) Pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subdivision, such publicity
shall direct attention to any change of the location of impacted polling
places or election districts, if applicable, and shall contain such
other information as the board of elections shall deem necessary and
proper.
4. Action by the board of elections to provide additional time for
voting pursuant to subdivision one of this section shall be dispositive
and conclusive of the issue of whether a delay or disruption has
occurred warranting such remedial action, and any ballots cast by eligi-
ble voters during the adjusted remedial timeframe for voting shall not
be segregated from other ballots cast by eligible voters or subject to
challenge or judicial review on the basis that such ballots were cast
out of time; provided, however, that this subdivision shall not preju-
dice the right of any registered voter eligible to vote at such a

S. 4602--A 4
delayed or disrupted polling place or election district, or any candi-
date or committee with candidates or questions appearing on a ballot to
be voted upon in any such polling place or election district, to seek
independent judicial relief for an order extending the timeframe for
voting pursuant to subdivision one of this section, or for review of an
adverse agency decision pursuant to subdivision two of this section,
pursuant to state or federal law.
§ 2. Subdivision 2 of section 8-100 of the election law, as separately
amended by chapter 6 and section 1 of part BBB of chapter 55 of the laws
of 2019, is amended to read as follows:
2. Polls shall be open for voting during the following hours: a prima-
ry election from six o'clock in the morning until nine o'clock in the
evening; the general election from six o'clock in the morning until nine
o'clock in the evening; a special election called by the governor pursu-
ant to the public officers law, and, except as otherwise provided by
law, every other election, from six o'clock in the morning until nine
o'clock in the evening; early voting hours shall be as provided in title
six of this article. Early voting times shall be as provided in section
8-600 of this article. In the event of a delay or disruption to voting,
the board of elections is authorized to toll, adjust, and extend the
timeframe for voting pursuant to section 3-109 of this chapter.
§ 3. Section 8-102 of the election law is amended by adding a new
subdivision 3 to read as follows:
3. In the event that early voting or election day voting for one or
more election districts or poll sites is delayed or disrupted prior to
the close of polls on any day of election for a duration exceeding
fifteen consecutive minutes, the polling place coordinator, election
district chairperson, or, if such persons are unavailable, any inspector
of election, shall immediately notify the board of elections. There
shall be a presumption of a violation of subdivision one of section
17-212 of this chapter when any person, by commission or omission,
intentionally frustrates the purposes of this section.
§ 4. Paragraph (f) of subdivision 4 of section 8-600 of the election
law, as added by chapter 480 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as
follows:
(f) If the location of an early voting polling place as designated
pursuant to paragraph (e) of this subdivision changes prior to such
early voting period, notice shall be provided to all affected eligible
voters no later than five days prior to such voting period in accordance
with the communication plan established pursuant to subdivision five of
this section or as soon as practicable if such location change occurs
within five days of the commencement of such early voting period;
provided, however, no such location change may occur within forty-eight
hours of such commencement unless there is any disaster within the mean-
ing of section 3-108 of this chapter or disruption within the meaning of
section 3-109 of this chapter or a declared state of emergency by the
governor or any court of competent jurisdiction in the county where the
polling place is located.
§ 5. This act shall take effect immediately.